Illinois, session 104th, HB2397.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Eddie Thomas 5Act.  6    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 7adding Section 3-2-15 as follows: 8    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-15 new)9    Sec. 3-2-15. Department of Corrections; report of hospice 10and palliative care for committed persons. 11    (a) Purposes. The General Assembly finds that:12        (1) The United States prison population is aging 13    rapidly. 14        (2) Illinois' prison population is similarly aging 15    rapidly, with over 1,000 prisoners aged 65 or older. 16        (3) As a result of the aging prison population more 17    committed persons are in need of end-of-life care and 18    support services. 19        (4) The Department of Corrections has a policy on 20    end-of-life care, which provides, in part, that the goals 21    are: "safe, dignified and comfortable dying, 22    self-determined life closure and effective grieving".   HB2397 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08043 RLC 18089 b1        (5) The Department of Corrections does not have a 2    formal hospice program; rather, end-of-life care is 3    provided on a prison-by-prison basis which results in 4    inconsistent care for committed persons who have been 5    diagnosed with terminal illnesses or who are expected to 6    reach the end of their life. 7        (6) At some prisons, end-of-life care is at times 8    provided, in part, by other committed persons assigned as 9    aides. 10        (7) The Department of Corrections does not have 11    centralized or consistent data on the number of committed 12    persons receiving end-of-life care.13        (8) The Department of Corrections does not have 14    centralized or consistent data on the number of prisoner 15    aides who are assigned to assist in providing end-of-life 16    care. 17        (9) The Department of Corrections does not currently 18    have a system for tracking patient outcomes or grievances 19    related to the quality of end-of-life care provided. 20        (10) Data on the end-of-life care provided in the 21    Department of Corrections is needed to give the General 22    Assembly and the public an understanding of the 23    Department's approach to end-of-life care for terminally 24    ill committed persons in its custody. 25        (11) Eddie Thomas was a committed person of the 26    Department of Corrections who died alone in the back of a   HB2397 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08043 RLC 18089 b1    prison infirmary without any end-of-life care just 5 2    months after being diagnosed with late stage lung cancer. 3    (b) Definitions. In this Section: 4    "Advance directive for health care" means written 5instructions of the patient's wishes as to how future care 6should be delivered or declined, including decisions that must 7be made when the patient is not capable of expressing those 8wishes. Advance directives may also appoint an agent with 9power of attorney for health care. 10    "Department" means the Department of Corrections. 11    "Hospice and palliative care" means physical, social, 12emotional, and spiritual support care for committed persons 13who have been diagnosed with a known terminal condition with a 14life expectancy of 6 months or less. This includes, but is not 15limited to, assistance with activities of daily living and 16comfort care. 17    "Peer support" refers to assistance and companionship 18provided by committed persons who have been trained to offer 19emotional, social, and practical support to fellow committed 20persons receiving hospice and palliative care. 21    "Terminal condition" means an incurable or irreversible 22condition that, without the administration of life-sustaining 23procedures, will, according to reasonable medical judgment, 24result in death within a relatively short period of time; or a 25state of permanent unconsciousness from which, to a reasonable 26degree of medical certainty, there can be no recovery.   HB2397 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08043 RLC 18089 b1    (c) Reporting requirement. No later than December 1 of 2each year, the Department shall prepare a report to be 3published on its website that contains, at a minimum, the 4following information about hospice and palliative care in its 5institutions and facilities during the prior fiscal year:6        (1) demographic data of committed persons who received 7    hospice and palliative care, separated by the following 8    categories: 9            (A) race or ethnicity; 10            (B) gender; 11            (C) age; 12            (D) primary cause of terminal illness or 13        condition; and 14            (E) length of incarceration prior to receiving 15        end-of-life care; 16        (2) data on the number of committed persons in the 17    Department's hospice and palliative care programs, 18    including the following: 19            (A) the total number of committed persons enrolled 20        in the Department's hospice and palliative care 21        programs; 22            (B) the total number of admissions into and 23        discharges from the Department's hospice and 24        palliative care programs, including the number of 25        committed persons who died while in the program and 26        the number of committed persons who were removed from   HB2397 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08043 RLC 18089 b1        the program for other reasons; and 2            (C) the number of committed persons denied entry 3        into the Department's hospice and palliative care 4        programs, including any reasons that they were denied; 5        (3) data on the timing of hospice and palliative care 6    programming, including the following: 7            (A) the average length of time that committed 8        persons receive hospice and palliative care; and 9            (B) the average length of time between the 10        diagnosis of a terminal condition and admission into a 11        hospice and palliative care program; 12        (4) the number of committed persons in the custody of 13    the Department who died, separated by the following 14    categories: 15            (A) committed persons who died while receiving 16        hospice and palliative care; and17            (B) committed persons who died without receiving 18        hospice and palliative care, and the number of such 19        committed persons who died as a result of natural, 20        accidental, suicidal, or homicidal causes; 21        (5) policies and administrative directives of each 22    Department institution and facility regarding the 23    institution of hospice and palliative care. This data 24    shall include the following information: 25            (A) the name of each institution and facility that 26        offers hospice and palliative care services;   HB2397 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08043 RLC 18089 b1            (B) criteria to be eligible for hospice and 2        palliative care services, both Department-wide and at 3        each institution and facility; 4            (C) a list of the types of hospice and palliative 5        care services that are offered in each institution and 6        facility. This list shall include, but is not limited 7        to, pain management, psychological counseling, peer 8        support, and chaplain services. If available, this 9        list shall also include supportive services offered to 10        family members of committed persons; 11            (D) the accreditation status of the Department's 12        hospice and palliative care programs, if available; 13            (E) the procedures for committed persons in the 14        Department's custody to request an advance directive 15        for health care in each institution and facility; 16            (F) the procedures for health care or legal staff 17        to assist committed persons in completing advance 18        directive instruments; and 19            (G) the procedures for health care providers to 20        implement advance directives for health care in each 21        institution and facility; 22        (6) the staff available for hospice and palliative 23    care. This data shall include the following: 24            (A) the number of specialized staff at each 25        institution and facility, including palliative care 26        physicians, nurses, and social workers;   HB2397 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08043 RLC 18089 b1            (B) the number of volunteers dedicated to hospice 2        and palliative care, separated by the following 3        categories: 4                (i) volunteers who are committed persons of 5            the Department; 6                (ii) volunteers who are not committed persons 7            of the Department; and 8                (iii) the ratio between the number of staff 9            and the number of patients in the Department's 10            hospice and palliative care programs; and 11        (7) the cost of the Department's hospice and 12    palliative care programs, including the following: 13            (A) the annual costs associated with hospice and 14        palliative care across the Department; 15            (B) the sources of funding for hospice and 16        palliative care services; and17            (C) the annual costs associated with hospice and 18        palliative care at each Department institution and 19        facility. 20    All such data shall be anonymized to protect the privacy 21of the committed persons involved in the hospice and 22palliative care programs.